South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3338.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) diapers, including diapers for babies and children, as well as adult diapers for the managing of postpartum recovery or incontinence. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----